Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5032.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3-7-16.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 3-7 entitled "Retail
Licenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
3-7-16.3. Class T legitimate theater license.
(a) Legitimate theaters as defined in subsection (b) or subsection (c) may apply for a Class
T license. The license authorizes the holder of the license to keep for sale and to sell beverages at
retail in the place described in the license and to deliver those beverages for consumption on the
premises where sold at the times when scheduled events relating to art, the legitimate theater or
community artistic experiences may be held on those premises and for a period of one hour prior
to those events and one hour subsequent thereto, provided those events begin subsequent to twelve
o’clock (12:00) noon. The licensed premises may contain a bar. A Class T license authorizes
entertainment only in conformity with ordinances of the city or town where the facility is located
on the licensed premises. Class T licenses shall only be issued by the local licensing authority.
(b) “Legitimate theaters,” for the purposes of this section, includes nonprofit, cultural
organizations and for-profit historic theaters located in the city of Newport, or the town of
Burrillville or the town of Jamestown, with a primary purpose of providing a support system to
deliver and coordinate various arts activities for the benefit of the communities the theaters serve
or that provide live, regularly scheduled theatrical productions on a regular basis throughout the
year and all events contributing toward the goal of providing quality artistic experiences for the
community.

(c) For purposes of this section, “legitimate theaters” shall also include facility
management corporations that are contractually authorized to manage buildings owned or under
the authority of the Rhode Island Convention Center Authority with a primary purpose of providing
a support system to deliver and coordinate various arts activities for the benefit of the communities
the corporations serve or that provide live, regularly scheduled theatrical productions on a regular
basis throughout the year and all events contributing toward the goal of providing quality artistic
experiences for the community.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000045
========
LC000045 - Page 2 of 3